District of Columbia statutes.
26-1013

Examinations.

(a)

The Superintendent [Commissioner] may in his discretion conduct an on-site examination of a licensee upon 45 days written notice to the licensee. The licensee shall pay all reasonably incurred costs of the examination. The on-site examination may be conducted in conjunction with examinations to be performed by representatives of agencies of another state. The Superintendent [Commissioner], in lieu of an on-site examination, may accept the examination report of an agency of another state; or a report prepared by an independent accounting firm; and reports so accepted shall be considered for all purposes as an official report of the Superintendent [Commissioner].

(b)

The Superintendent [Commissioner] may (1) request financial data from a licensee in addition to that required under § 26-1010 or (2) conduct an on-site examination of a licensee, authorized delegate or location of a licensee within the District of Columbia without prior notice to the authorized delegate or licensee if the Superintendent [Commissioner] has a reasonable basis to believe that the licensee or authorized delegate is not in compliance with this chapter. When the Superintendent [Commissioner] examines an authorized delegate’s operations, the authorized delegate shall pay all reasonably incurred costs of the examination. When the Superintendent [Commissioner] examines a licensee’s location within the District of Columbia, the licensee shall pay all reasonably incurred costs of the examination.

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 14, 47 DCR 3431